Illinois, session 104th, HB3318.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 5Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 is amended by 6changing Sections 3A-1 and 3-1 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 410/3-1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-1)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 3-1. Cosmetology defined. Any one or any combination 10of the following practices constitutes the practice of 11cosmetology when done for cosmetic or beautifying purposes and 12not for the treatment of disease or of a muscular or nervous 13disorder: arranging, braiding, dressing, cutting, trimming, 14curling, waving, chemical restructuring, shaping, singeing, 15bleaching, coloring or similar work, upon the hair of the head 16or any cranial prosthesis; cutting or trimming facial hair of 17any person; any practice of manicuring, pedicuring, decorating 18nails, applying sculptured nails or otherwise artificial nails 19by hand or with mechanical or electrical apparatus or 20appliances, or in any way caring for the nails or the skin of 21the hands or feet including massaging the hands, arms, elbows, 22feet, lower legs, and knees of another person for other than 23the treatment of medical disorders; any practice of epilation   HB3318- 2 -LRB104 11139 AAS 21221 b1or depilation of any person; any practice for the purpose of 2cleansing, massaging or toning the skin of the scalp; 3beautifying, massaging, cleansing, exfoliating, or stimulating 4the stratum corneum of the epidermis by the use of cosmetic 5preparations, body treatments, body wraps, the use of 6hydrotherapy, or any device, electrical, mechanical, or 7otherwise, including hydrodermabrasion devices such as the 8Hydrafacial machine; applying make-up or eyelashes to any 9person or lightening or coloring hair on the body and removing 10superfluous hair from the body of any person by the use of 11depilatories, waxing, threading, or tweezers. The term 12"cosmetology" does not include the services provided by an 13electrologist. Nail technology is the practice and the study 14of cosmetology only to the extent of manicuring, pedicuring, 15decorating, and applying sculptured or otherwise artificial 16nails, or in any way caring for the nail or the skin of the 17hands or feet including massaging the hands, arms, elbows, 18feet, lower legs, and knees. Cosmetologists are prohibited 19from using any technique, product, or practice intended to 20affect the living layers of the skin. The term cosmetology 21includes rendering advice on what is cosmetically appealing, 22but no person licensed under this Act shall render advice on 23what is appropriate medical treatment for diseases of the 24skin. Purveyors of cosmetics may demonstrate such cosmetic 25products in conjunction with any sales promotion and shall not 26be required to hold a license under this Act. Nothing in this   HB3318- 3 -LRB104 11139 AAS 21221 b1Act shall be construed to prohibit the shampooing of hair by 2persons employed for that purpose and who perform that task 3under the direct supervision of a licensed cosmetologist or 4licensed cosmetology teacher.5(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 6    (225 ILCS 410/3A-1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 3A-1. Esthetics defined. 9    (A) Any one or combination of the following practices, 10when done for cosmetic or beautifying purposes and not for the 11treatment of disease or of a muscular or nervous disorder, 12constitutes the practice of esthetics:13        1. Beautifying, massaging, cleansing, exfoliating, or 14    stimulating the stratum corneum of the epidermis by the 15    use of cosmetic preparations, body treatments, body wraps, 16    hydrotherapy, or any device, electrical, mechanical, or 17    otherwise, including hydrodermabrasion devices such as the 18    Hydrafacial machine, for the care of the skin;19        2. Applying make-up or eyelashes to any person or 20    lightening or coloring hair on the body except the scalp; 21    and22        3. Removing superfluous hair from the body of any 23    person.24    However, esthetics does not include the services provided 25by a cosmetologist or electrologist. Estheticians are   HB3318- 4 -LRB104 11139 AAS 21221 b1prohibited from using techniques, products, and practices 2intended to affect the living layers of the skin. The term 3esthetics includes rendering advice on what is cosmetically 4appealing, but no person licensed under this Act shall render 5advice on what is appropriate medical treatment for diseases 6of the skin.7    (B) "Esthetician" means any person who, with hands or 8mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances, engages only 9in the use of cosmetic preparations, body treatments, body 10wraps, hydrotherapy, makeups, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, 11creams or other preparations or in the practice of massaging, 12cleansing, exfoliating the stratum corneum of the epidermis, 13stimulating, manipulating, beautifying, grooming, threading, 14or similar work on the face, neck, arms and hands or body in a 15superficial mode, and not for the treatment of medical 16disorders.17(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.